Utah statutes.
48-2a-502.   Liability for contribution.
(1)  A promise by a limited partner to contribute to the limited partnership
is not enforceable unless set out in a writing signed by the limited partner.
(2)  Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner is obligated
to the limited partnership to perform any enforceable promise to contribute
cash or property or to perform services, even if he is unable to perform
because of death, disability, or any other reason.  If a partner does not make
the required contribution of property or services, he is obligated at the
option of the limited partnership to contribute cash equal to that portion of
the value, as stated in the partnership records required to be kept pursuant
to Section 48-2a-105, of the stated contribution which has not been made.
(3)  Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, the obligation of
a partner to make a contribution or return money or other property paid or
distributed in violation of this chapter may be compromised only by consent of
all partners.  Notwithstanding the compromise, a creditor of a limited
partnership who extends credit, or otherwise acts in reliance on that
obligation after the partner signs a writing which reflects the obligation and
before the amendment or cancellation thereof to reflect the compromise may
enforce the original obligation.
